Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.210

Basic education—Goals of school districts.

A basic education is an evolving program of instruction that is intended to provide students with the opportunity to become responsible and respectful global citizens, to contribute to their economic well-being and that of their families and communities, to explore and understand different perspectives, and to enjoy productive and satisfying lives. Additionally, the state of Washington intends to provide for a public school system that is able to evolve and adapt in order to better focus on strengthening the educational achievement of all students, which includes high expectations for all students and gives all students the opportunity to achieve personal and academic success. To these ends, the goals of each school district, with the involvement of parents and community members, shall be to provide opportunities for every student to develop the knowledge and skills essential to:

(1) Read with comprehension, write effectively, and communicate successfully in a variety of ways and settings and with a variety of audiences;

(2) Know and apply the core concepts and principles of mathematics; social, physical, and life sciences; civics and history, including different cultures and participation in representative government; geography; arts; and health and fitness;

(3) Think analytically, logically, and creatively, and to integrate technology literacy and fluency as well as different experiences and knowledge to form reasoned judgments and solve problems; and

(4) Understand the importance of work and finance and how performance, effort, and decisions directly affect future career and educational opportunities.

[ 2011 c 280 s 2; 2009 c 548 s 103; 2007 c 400 s 1; 1993 c 336 s 101; (1992 c 141 s 501 repealed by 1993 c 336 s 1203); 1977 ex.s. c 359 s 2. Formerly RCW 28A.58.752.]

NOTES:

Finding—2011 c 280: "The legislature finds that technology can be effectively integrated into other K-12 core subjects that students are expected to know and be able to do. Integration of knowledge and skills in technology literacy and fluency into other subjects will engage and motivate students to explore high-demand careers, such as engineering, mathematics, computer science, communication, art, entrepreneurship, and others; fields in which skilled individuals will create the new ideas, new products, and new industries of the future; and fields that demand the collaborative information skills and technological fluency of digital citizenship." [ 2011 c 280 s 1.]

Effective date—2011 c 280: "This act takes effect September 1, 2011." [ 2011 c 280 s 3.]

Effective date—2009 c 548 ss 101-110 and 701-710: See note following RCW 28A.150.200.

Intent—2009 c 548: See RCW 28A.150.1981.

Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.410.270.

Intent—Finding—2009 c 548: See note following RCW 28A.305.130.

Captions not law—2007 c 400: "Captions used in this act are not any part of the law." [ 2007 c 400 s 9.]

Findings—Intent—1993 c 336: "The legislature finds that student achievement in Washington must be improved to keep pace with societal changes, changes in the workplace, and an increasingly competitive international economy.

To increase student achievement, the legislature finds that the state of Washington needs to develop a public school system that focuses more on the educational performance of students, that includes high expectations for all students, and that provides more flexibility for school boards and educators in how instruction is provided.

The legislature further finds that improving student achievement will require:

(1) Establishing what is expected of students, with standards set at internationally competitive levels;

(2) Parents to be primary partners in the education of their children, and to play a significantly greater role in local school decision making;

(3) Students taking more responsibility for their education;

(4) Time and resources for educators to collaboratively develop and implement strategies for improved student learning;

(5) Making instructional programs more relevant to students' future plans;

(6) All parties responsible for education to focus more on what is best for students; and

(7) An educational environment that fosters mutually respectful interactions in an atmosphere of collaboration and cooperation.

It is the intent of the legislature to provide students the opportunity to achieve at significantly higher levels, and to provide alternative or additional instructional opportunities to help students who are having difficulty meeting the essential academic learning requirements in RCW 28A.630.885.

It is also the intent of the legislature that students who have met or exceeded the essential academic learning requirements be provided with alternative or additional instructional opportunities to help advance their educational experience.

The provisions of chapter 336, Laws of 1993 shall not be construed to change current state requirements for students who receive home-based instruction under chapter 28A.200 RCW, or for students who attend state-approved private schools under chapter 28A.195 RCW." [ 1993 c 336 s 1.]

Effective date—1993 c 336 s 101: "Section 101 of this act shall take effect September 1, 1994." [ 1993 c 336 s 102.]

Findings—1993 c 336: "(1) The legislature finds that preparing students to make successful transitions from school to work helps promote educational, career, and personal success for all students.

(2) A successful school experience should prepare students to make informed career direction decisions at critical points in their educational progress. Schools that demonstrate the relevancy and practical application of coursework will expose students to a broad range of interrelated career and educational opportunities and will expand students' posthigh school options.

(3) The school-to-work transitions program, under chapter 335, Laws of 1993, is intended to help secondary schools develop model programs for school-to-work transitions. The purposes of the model programs are to provide incentives for selected schools to:

(a) Integrate vocational and academic instruction into a single curriculum;

(b) Provide each student with a choice of multiple, flexible educational pathways based on the student's career interest areas;

(c) Emphasize increased vocational and academic guidance and counseling for students;

(d) Foster partnerships with local employers and employees to incorporate work sites as part of work-based learning experiences;

(e) Encourage collaboration among middle or junior high schools and secondary schools in developing successful transition programs and to encourage articulation agreements between secondary schools and community and technical colleges.

(4) The legislature further finds that successful implementation of the school-to-work transitions program is an important part of achieving the purposes of chapter 336, Laws of 1993." [ 1993 c 336 s 601.]

Part headings not law—1993 c 336: "Part headings as used in this act constitute no part of the law." [ 1993 c 336 s 1204.]

Findings—Part headings—Severability—1992 c 141: See notes following RCW 28A.410.040.

Effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 359: See notes following RCW 28A.150.200.